District of Columbia statutes.
50-2707

Effect of repeal.

The repeal of any law or regulation as a result of the enactment of this chapter shall not invalidate any enforcement action, adjudication, or other action made or taken pursuant to that law or regulation.

June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-139, § 8, 53 DCR 3682

History